Mississippi statutes. Title 5. Legislative Department
Chapter 7. Lobbying
[Repealed]

§§ 5-7-1 through 5-7-19.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1994, ch. 469, § 12, eff from and after January 3, 1995 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the repeal of this chapter).

§5-7-1. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 5540; 1930, § 5477; 1942, § 3366; Laws, 1916, ch. 105; Laws, 1977, ch. 388, § 3]

§5-7-3. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 5541; 1930, § 5478; 1942, § 3367; Laws, 1916, ch. 105]

§5-7-5. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 5545; 1930, § 5482; 1942, § 3371; Laws, 1916, ch. 105; Laws, 1977, ch. 388, § 4]

§5-7-6. [Laws, 1977, ch. 388, § 1]

§5-7-7. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 5542; 1930, § 5479; 1942, § 3368; Laws, 1916, ch. 105]

§5-7-9. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 5543; 1930, § 5480; 1942, § 3369; Laws, 1916, ch. 105.]

§5-7-11. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 5541, 5542, 5544; 1930, §§ 5478, 5479, 5481; 1942, §§ 3367, 3368, 3370; Laws, 1916, ch. 105; 1977, ch. 388, § 5]

§5-7-13. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 5546; 1930, § 5483; 1942, § 3372; Laws, 1916, ch. 105; Laws, 1977, ch. 388, § 6]

§5-7-15. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 5547; 1930, § 5484; 1942, § 3373; Laws, 1916, ch. 105; Laws, 1977, ch. 388, § 8]

§5-7-17. [Laws, 1977, ch. 388, § 7]

§5-7-19. [Laws, 1977, ch. 388, § 2]